Washington statutes.
RCW 36.110.160

Technical training assistance.

Technical training assistance shall be provided to local jurisdictions by the board at the jurisdiction's request. To facilitate and promote the development of local jail industries programs, this training and technical assistance may include the following: (1) Delivery of statewide jail industry implementation workshops for administrators of jail industries programs; (2) development of recruitment and education programs for local business and labor to gain their participation; (3) ongoing staff assistance regarding local jail industries issues, such as sound business management skills, development of a professional business plan, responding to questions regarding risk management, industrial insurance, and similar matters; and (4) provision of guidelines and assistance for the coordination of basic educational programs and jail industries as well as other technical skills required by local jails in the implementation of safe, productive, and effective jail industries programs.

[ 1995 c 154 s 4.]